Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202677-3170
Rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out the Reverse Osmosis System Tax Credit Act.

Laws 2024, LB937, § 63.